Maryland, session 2026, HB0423.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
7–426.5.
(f) (1) On or before October 1 each year, each public school shall submit, on
the form that the Department requires, a report to the Department on each incident at the
school that required the use of naloxone or other overdose–reversing medication.
7–455.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
– 1 –

Ch. 583 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(2) “DRINK SPIKING DETECTION PRODUCT” MEANS A PRODUCT THAT
HAS ONE OR MORE TEST SPOTS THAT ALLOW THE USER TO TEST A PORTION OF A
BEVERAGE TO DETERMINE WHETHER THE BEVERAGE HAS BEEN CONTAMINATED
WITH THE DRUG GAMMA–HYDROXYBUTYRIC ACID (GHB) OR KETAMINE.
(3) “DRUG DETECTION STRIP” MEANS A DISPOSABLE TEST STRIP
THAT ALLOWS AN INDIVIDUAL TO TEST A DRUG FOR THE PRESENCE OF FENTANYL.
(B) THIS SECTION APPLIES ONLY IN PRINCE GEORGE’S COUNTY.
(C) BEGINNING IN THE 2026–2027 SCHOOL YEAR, THE PRINCE GEORGE’S
COUNTY BOARD OF EDUCATION SHALL REQUIRE EACH PUBLIC HIGH SCHOOL IN
THE COUNTY TO PROVIDE, AT NO CHARGE TO STUDENTS, DRINK SPIKING DETECTION
PRODUCTS AND DRUG DETECTION STRIPS
(1) IT IS THE INTENT OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY THAT THE PUBLIC
HIGH SCHOOLS IN PRINCE GEORGE’S COUNTY PROVIDE DRINK SPIKING DETECTION
PRODUCTS AND DRUG DETECTION STRIPS TO THEIR STUDENTS.
(2) SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (3) OF THIS SUBSECTION, BEGINNING IN
THE 2026–2027 SCHOOL YEAR, THE PRINCE GEORGE’S COUNTY BOARD OF
EDUCATION SHALL REQUIRE EACH PUBLIC HIGH SCHOOL IN THE COUNTY TO
PROVIDE, AT NO COST TO STUDENTS:
(I) DRINK SPIKING DETECTION PRODUCTS; AND
(II) DRUG DETECTION STRIPS, IF A PUBLIC HIGH SCHOOL IN
THE COUNTY REPORTS AN INCIDENT AT THE SCHOOL REQUIRING THE USE OF
NALOXONE OR OTHER OVERDOSE–REVERSING MEDICATION IN ACCORDANCE WITH
§ 7–426.5(F)(1) OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(3) PUBLIC HIGH SCHOOLS IN THE COUNTY ARE REQUIRED TO
PROVIDE DRINK SPIKING DETECTION PRODUCTS AND DRUG DETECTION STRIPS IN
ACCORDANCE WITH PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION ONLY IF THE PRODUCTS
ARE PROVIDED TO THE PUBLIC HIGH SCHOOLS AT NO COST TO THE SCHOOLS.
(D) THE DRINK SPIKING DETECTION PRODUCTS AND DRUG DETECTION
STRIPS REQUIRED TO BE PROVIDED TO HIGH SCHOOL STUDENTS UNDER THIS
SECTION MAY BE MADE AVAILABLE IN SCHOOL–BASED HEALTH CLINICS OR SCHOOL
LIBRARIES.
(E) ON OR BEFORE OCTOBER 1, 2027, AND EACH OCTOBER 1 THEREAFTER,
EACH PUBLIC HIGH SCHOOL IN THE COUNTY SHALL REPORT TO MARYLAND’S
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 583
OFFICE OF OVERDOSE RESPONSE ON THE QUANTITY OF DRUG DETECTION
PRODUCTS DISTRIBUTED BY THE SCHOOL DURING THE PREVIOUS SCHOOL YEAR.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.
Approved by the Governor, May 12, 2026.
– 3 –